Hawaii statutes.
[§431:8-326] Time of examinations.
(a) The commissioner shall give examinations within this State at times and
places as may reasonably serve the convenience of both the commissioner and
applicants.

(b) The commissioner may require a waiting
period of not more than six months before giving a new examination to an
applicant who has failed to pass two previous examinations for a surplus
brokers license. [L 2012, c 66, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next